Maryland, session 2025, HB0341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–275.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISCOUNT STORE” MEANS A RETAIL STORE THAT OFFERS FOR
SALE:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0341*

HOUSE BILL 341
(I) A COMBINATION AND VARIETY OF CONVENIENCE AND
CONSUMER SHOPPING GOODS; AND
(II) THE MAJORITY OF THE ITEMS IN THE INVENTORY AT A
PRICE NOT TO EXCEED $5.
(3) “RETAIL USE” DOES NOT INCLUDE USE AS A DISCOUNT STORE OR
A SELF–SERVICE STORAGE FACILITY.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT A PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION BE GRANTED PRIMARILY TO DEFRAY
COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE REMOVAL OF UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANKS AND
THE REMEDIATION OF ANY CONTAMINATION ASSOCIATED WITH UNDERGROUND
STORAGE TANKS.
(C) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY GRANT, BY LAW,
A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY IF THE USE
OF THE REAL PROPERTY HAS BEEN CONVERTED FROM A RETAIL SERVICE STATION
TO ANOTHER RETAIL USE, A RESIDENTIAL USE, OR A MIXED RETAIL AND
RESIDENTIAL USE.
(D) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY PROVIDE, BY
LAW, FOR:
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION;
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR THE TAX CREDIT;
(3) REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND
UNIFORM PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT; AND
(4) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(E) AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET, THE STATE SHALL PAY TO EACH
COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT GRANTS THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 50% OF THE PROPERTY TAX REVENUE THAT WOULD
HAVE BEEN COLLECTED IF THE TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION HAD NOT BEEN

HOUSE BILL 341 3
GRANTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.